Maine, session 132, LD125.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 10 MRSA §1100-T, sub-§4, as amended by PL 2021, c. 412, §4, is further
amended to read:
4. Total of credits authorized. The authority may issue tax credit certificates to
investors eligible pursuant to subsections 2, 2‑A and 2‑C in an aggregate amount not to
exceed $2,000,000 up to and including calendar year 1996, $3,000,000 up to and including
calendar year 1997, $5,500,000 up to and including calendar year 1998, $8,000,000 up to
and including calendar year 2001, $11,000,000 up to and including calendar year 2002,
$14,000,000 up to and including calendar year 2003, $17,000,000 up to and including
calendar year 2004, $20,000,000 up to and including calendar year 2005, $23,000,000 up
to and including calendar year 2006, $26,000,000 up to and including calendar year 2007
and $30,000,000 up to and including calendar year 2013, in addition to which, the authority
may issue tax credit certificates to investors eligible pursuant to subsections 2, 2‑A and 2‑C
in an annual amount not to exceed $675,000 for investments made between January 1, 2014
and December 31, 2014, $4,000,000 for investments made in calendar year 2015,
$5,000,000 for investments made in calendar years 2016 to 2019, $15,000,000 for
investments made in calendar year 2020, $13,500,000 for investments made in calendar
years 2021 and 2022, $15,000,000 for investments made in calendar years 2023 to 2026
and $5,000,000 $10,000,000 each year for investments made in calendar years beginning
with 2027. The authority may provide that investors eligible for a tax credit under this
section in a year when there is insufficient credit available are entitled to take the credit
when it becomes available subject to limitations established by the authority by rule. Rules
adopted pursuant to this subsection are routine technical rules as defined in Title 5, chapter
375, subchapter 2‑A.
Page 1 - 132LR0182(03)